Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.103

Notice to commission of reduced net worth.

Each public depositary shall notify the commission in writing within forty-eight hours, or by close of business of the next business day thereafter, of the happening of an event which causes its net worth to be reduced by an amount greater than ten percent of the amount shown as its net worth on the most recent report submitted pursuant to RCW 39.58.100.

[ 2009 c 9 s 8; 1983 c 66 s 13; 1975 1st ex.s. c 77 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 9: See note following RCW 39.58.010.

Severability—1983 c 66: See note following RCW 39.58.010.